src/hyphenate.ES.foma
# Hyphenate (Spanish)
# ===================
# This script divides Spanish words into syllables.
#
# Since Spanish pronunciation follows ortography, it would be expected that
# syllabification based on ortography only would be possible. This is almost
# true. The problems come with diphtongs and hiatuses, since in different
# dialects these are made in different situations. Orthographical accents
# ("tilde" in Spanish) are supposed to help disambiguating pitch accent, and
# thus determining whether two vowels do or not form a diphtong. However, many
# of these rules rely on the speaker's knowledge of the prosody of a given word,
# so can't be used effectively only with orthography.
#
# When possible, the rules stated by the Real Academia de la Lengua (supervisor
# body of Spanish) are followed.

# Consonants
# ----------
# Consonants can be divided in a number of groups depending on the combinations
# with other consonants they allow, and their order in this clusters. The
# groups' names are probably very linguistically incorrect, but the author is
# not a linguist and very lacking in proper terminology.
#
# In the special digraphs `qU` and `gU`, the uppercase `U` is used to indicate
# that this is not a vowel, so it is not erroneously incorporated into the nucleus.
define OnsetOnly [{rr}|{ch}|h|j|{ll}|Y|ñ|{qU}|{gU}];
define Alone [m|n|s|x|y|z];
define Liquid [m|n|s];
define Hard [b|c|d|f|g|k|p|t|v|w];
define Soft [l|r];

# Spanish allows much shorter consonant clusters than English, and onset and
# coda are clearly different.
define Onset OnsetOnly | Alone | [(Hard) (Soft)];
define Coda (Hard | Soft | Alone) (Liquid);

# Vowels
# ------
# Vowels with a "tilde" (accent) have the pitch accent of the word, so they are
# always the strong partner in a diphtong. Some sources state that when a tilde
# is present, there is no diphtong, but the author has not found conclusive
# arguments, and in his particular dialect this happens to not (always) be true.
define Tilde [á|é|í|ó|ú];
define Open [a|e|o];
define Closed [i|u];
define Vowel Tilde | Open | Closed;

# The nucleus is thus defined as a vowel, dipthong or tripthong. The special
# vowel `ü` is always part of a dipthong, since the dieresis is used to indicate
# that the u is to be pronounced before an e or i (usually silent after q or g).
# `y` at the end of word is pronounced as `i`.
define Nucleus Closed | [(Closed | ü) [Open|Tilde] (Closed | y)] | {ui} | {iu};

# Hyphenating
# -----------
# First, the syllable nucleus must be found, with a __longest__ match approach since
# we want to allow dipthongs. When we find the nucleus, we mark it with `NUC` to
# both sides. Then syllables, defined as onset + nucleus + coda are found.
#
# Two steps are needed because syllable matching is __shortest__ match.
# This encodes the Maximal Onset principle (actually, the equivalent Minimal
# Coda one).
#
# Hyphens are inserted after each syllable, provided it is followed by a valid
# syllable as context.
define Syllable Onset NUC ?+ NUC Coda;

# First `u` is marked in the digraphs in _qui_, _que_, _gui_ and _gue_.
# Intervocalic `y` is realized as a consonant, so it is marked so as to not be
# put in a nucleus (e.g. _ayer_)
regex u -> U || [g|q] _ [i|e]
  .o. y -> Y || Vowel _ Vowel
  .o. Nucleus @-> NUC ... NUC
  .o. Syllable @> ... "-" || _ Syllable
  .o. U -> u
  .o. Y -> y
  .o. NUC -> 0; # Cleanup
